test/src/gt-desc-yamls/adj-even_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Even syllable adjectives belonging to LAIKI, HAHTTI, JEAGOHEAPMI, ISSORAS, DABALAS, DEARVVASLAS, JIEDNAI, AKTIIVA, 

Tests:
  Adj - sealvi: # LAIKI
    sealvi+A+Attr: sealvves
    sealvi+A+Err/Orth+Attr: sealvis
    sealvi+A+Sg+Nom: sealvi
    sealvi+A+Sg+Gen: sealvvi
    sealvi+A+Sg+Acc: sealvvi
    sealvi+A+Sg+Ill: sealvái
    sealvi+A+Sg+Loc: sealvvis
    sealvi+A+Pl+Acc: selvviid
    sealvi+A+Pl+Com: selvviiguin
    sealvi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sealvvit
    sealvi+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: sealvvibuid
    sealvi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sealvvimus
    sealvi+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: sealvvimusain
    sealvi+A+Der/at+Adv: sealvvit
    
  Adj - molsašuddi: # HAHTTI
    molsašuddi+A+Attr: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Nom: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Gen: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Acc: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Ill: molsašuddái
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Loc: molsašuddis
    molsašuddi+A+Pl+Acc: molsašuddiid
    molsašuddi+A+Pl+Com: molsašuddiiguin

  Adj - čuolmmaheapme: # JEAGOHEAPMI
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Attr: čuolmmahis
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Nom: čuolmmaheapme
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: [čuolmmahin, čuolmmaheapmi]
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Gen: [čuolmmaheame, čuolmmaheami]
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Acc: [čuolmmaheame, čuolmmaheami]
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Ill: čuolmmaheapmái
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: čuolmmaheapmii
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Loc: [čuolmmaheames, čuolmmaheamis]
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Pl+Acc: čuolmmahemiid
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Pl+Com: čuolmmahemiiguin
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Der/at+Adv: [čuolmmaheamit, čuolmmaheamet]

  Adj - beavkálas: # ISSORAS
    beavkálas+A+Attr: beavkálas
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Nom: beavkálas
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Gen: beavkálasa
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Acc: beavkálasa
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Ill: beavkálassii
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: beavkálassai
    beavkálas+A+Sg+Loc: beavkálasas
    beavkálas+A+Pl+Acc: beavkálasaid
    beavkálas+A+Pl+Com: beavkálasaiguin
    beavkálas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [beavkáleabbo, beavkálabbo, beavkálut, beavkálit, beavkálet, beavkálat, beavkálasat]
    beavkálas+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [beavkálabbu, beavkálebbo, beavkáleabbu, beavkáleabbo, beavkálabbo]
    beavkálas+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [beavkáleappuid, beavkálabbuid, beavkálasabuid]
    beavkálas+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [beavkálebbuid, beavkáleappuid, beavkálabbuid]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [beavkáleamos, beavkálamos, beavkálasamus]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [beavkáleamus, beavkálemos]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [beavkálepmosiin, beavkálamosiin, beavkálasamusain]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [beavkálamosiinna, beavkálepmosiinna, beavkálasamusain]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [beavkálepmosiin, beavkálemosiin]
    beavkálas+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [beavkálepmosiinna, beavkálemosiinna]
    beavkálas+A+Der/at+Adv: beavkálasat

  Adj - jiešheanalaš: # DABALAS
    jiešheanalaš+A+Attr: jiešheanalaš
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Attr: [jiešheanalážž, jiešheanálaš]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Nom: jiešheanalaš
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanalážž, jiešheanálaš]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Gen: jiešheanalačča
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen: [jiešheanaláčča, jiešheanálačča]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Acc: jiešheanalačča
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Acc: [jiešheanaláčča, jiešheanálačča]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Ill: jiešheanalažžii
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Ill: [jiešheanálažžii, jiešheanalážžii]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Sg+Loc: jiešheanalaččas
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Loc: [jiešheanálaččas, jiešheanaláččas]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Pl+Acc: jiešheanalaččaid
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Acc: [jiešheanaláččaid, jiešheanálaččaid]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Pl+Com: jiešheanalaččaiguin
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: [jiešheanálaččaiguin, jiešheanaláččaiguin]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanaleabbo, jiešheanalabbo, jiešheanalut, jiešheanalit, jiešheanalet, jiešheanalat, jiešheanalaččat]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanálaččat, jiešheanálat, jiešheanálit, jiešheanaláččat, jiešheanálet, jiešheanáleabbo, jiešheanálabbo, jiešheanálut]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [jiešheanaleappuid, jiešheanalabbuid, jiešheanalaččabuid]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [jiešheanaláččabuid, jiešheanálabbuid, jiešheanáleappuid, jiešheanálaččabuid]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanaleamos, jiešheanalamos, jiešheanalaččamus]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanáleamos, jiešheanálaččamus, jiešheanálamos, jiešheanaláččamus]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [jiešheanalepmosiin, jiešheanalamosiin, jiešheanalaččamusain, jiešheanalaččamusain]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: [jiešheanálaččamusain, jiešheanálepmosiin, jiešheanálamosiin, jiešheanaláččamusain]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Der/at+Adv: jiešheanalaččat
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Der/at+Adv: [jiešheanaláččat, jiešheanálaččat]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth: jiešheanalažžat
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth: jiešheanálažžat
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [jiešheanalamosiinna, jiešheanalepmosiinna, jiešheanalaččamusain]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [jiešheanálemosiin, jiešheanálepmosiin]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: [jiešheanálamosiinna, jiešheanálepmosiinna, jiešheanaláččamusain, jiešheanálaččamusain]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: jiešheanálepmosiinna
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: jiešheanalemosiinna
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Com+Err/Orth: [jiešheanálemosiinna, jiešheanálepmosiinna]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth: jiešheanáláččamusain
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: jiešheanáláččamusain
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Pl+Loc: [jiešheanalemosiin, jiešheanalepmosiin]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanáleamus, jiešheanálemos]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Superl+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanalemos, jiešheanaleamus]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jiešheanáláččamus
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [jiešheanálebbuid, jiešheanáleappuid, jiešheanálabbuid]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [jiešheanálebbuid, jiešheanáleappuid, jiešheanálabbuid]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: jiešheanáláččabuid
    jiešheanalaš+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc: [jiešheanalebbuid, jiešheanalabbuid, jiešheanaleappuid]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: [jiešheanalebbuid, jiešheanalabbuid, jiešheanaleappuid]
    jiešheanalaš+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanalebbo, jiešheanaleabbo, jiešheanalabbo, jiešheanalabbu, jiešheanaleabbu]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Comp+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: [jiešheanálebbo, jiešheanálabbu, jiešheanáleabbu, jiešheanáleabbo, jiešheanálabbo]
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Der/at+Adv: jiešheanáláččat
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com+Err/Orth: jiešheanáláččaiguin
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Com: jiešheanáláččaiguin
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth: jiešheanáláččaid
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Pl+Acc: jiešheanáláččaid
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Loc: jiešheanáláččas
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: jiešheanálažžai
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Ill: jiešheanálážžii
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Gen: jiešheanáláčča
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Nom: jiešheanálážž
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Attr: jiešheanálážž
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jiešheanáláččat
    jiešheanalaš+Err/Orth+Err/Orth+A+Sg+Acc: jiešheanáláčča
    
  Adj - vuordevaš: # DEARVVASLAS
    vuordevaš+A+Attr: vuordevaš
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Nom: vuordevaš
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Gen: vuordevačča
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Acc: vuordevačča
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Ill: vuordevažžii
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth: vuordevažžai
    vuordevaš+A+Sg+Loc: vuordevaččas
    vuordevaš+A+Pl+Acc: vuordevaččaid
    vuordevaš+A+Pl+Com: vuordevaččaiguin
    vuordevaš+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vuordevaččat
    vuordevaš+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: vuordevaččabuid
    vuordevaš+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vuordevaččamus
    vuordevaš+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: vuordevaččamusain
    vuordevaš+A+Der/at+Adv: vuordevaččat

  Adj - biktaseaddjái: # JIEDNAI
    biktaseaddjái+A+Attr: biktaseaddjás
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Nom: biktaseaddjái
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Gen: biktaseaddjá
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Acc: biktaseaddjá
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Ill: biktaseaddjái
    biktaseaddjái+A+Sg+Loc: biktaseaddjás
    biktaseaddjái+A+Pl+Acc: biktaseaddjáid
    biktaseaddjái+A+Pl+Com: biktaseaddjáiguin
    biktaseaddjái+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: biktaseaddját
    biktaseaddjái+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: biktaseaddjábuid
    biktaseaddjái+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: biktaseaddjámus
    biktaseaddjái+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: biktaseaddjámusain
    biktaseaddjái+A+Der/at+Adv: biktaseaddjájit
    biktaseaddjái+A+Der/at+Adv+Err/Orth: biktaseaddját

  Adj - ekspressiiva: # AKTIIVA
    ekspressiiva+A+Attr: ekspressiiva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Nom: ekspressiiva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Gen: ekspressiivva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Acc: ekspressiivva
    ekspressiiva+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: ekspressiiva
    ekspressiiva+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Acc: ekspressiiva
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Ill: ekspressiivii
    ekspressiiva+A+Sg+Loc: ekspressiivvas
    ekspressiiva+A+Err/Orth+Sg+Loc: ekspressiivas
    ekspressiiva+A+Pl+Acc: ekspressiivvaid
    ekspressiiva+A+Pl+Com: ekspressiivvaiguin
    ekspressiiva+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ekspressiivvat
    ekspressiiva+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: ekspressiivvabuid
    ekspressiiva+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: ekspressiivvamus
    ekspressiiva+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: ekspressiivvamusain
    ekspressiiva+A+Der/at+Adv: ekspressiivvat
